Missouri, session 2026, HB3084.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 620.505, to read as follows:
620.505. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Small Business
Start-up Fee Reduction Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of economic development;
(2) "Eligible business", any Missouri-based business entity operating as a micro-
business during the start-up period;
(3) "Micro-business", a business with three or fewer employees, excluding the
owner;
(4) "Secretary", the secretary of state for the state of Missouri and his or her
delegates responsible for the administration of this section in coordination with the
department of economic development;
(5) "Start-up period", the first twenty-four months after a business is legally
formed or incorporated in Missouri.
3. (1) Eligible businesses shall qualify during the start-up period for a reduction
or waiver of the following fees:
(a) Fees associated with forming a limited liability company;
(b) Business name registration fees;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3084 2
(c) State vendor certification fees; and
(d) Annual reporting or registration fees.
(2) The department shall coordinate with the secretary to establish a fee-
reduction schedule which shall be updated annually and published on the department's
website.
(3) Fee waivers or reductions shall be based on standards and procedures
developed by the department in coordination with the secretary and shall be subject to
appropriation of funding by the general assembly to the department.
4. (1) The department and secretary shall reduce or waive the annual
registration and report filing fees for businesses that remain micro-businesses during
their start-up period.
(2) The department shall coordinate with the secretary's office to ensure that no
penalties or late fees shall be assessed for first-time filings made by a micro-business
within the start-up period, provided reasonable efforts are demonstrated by the micro-
business.
5. (1) The department shall enter into partnership agreements with Missouri-
based agencies, chambers of commerce, and entrepreneurial organizations to offer
voluntary support to eligible businesses under this section including, but not limited to,
providing:
(a) Business planning assistance;
(b) Marketing and branding support;
(c) Financial literacy training;
(d) Access to state vendor and contracting opportunities; and
(e) Connections to mentorship programs.
(2) An eligible business shall not be required to participate in support programs
under subdivision (1) of this subsection in order to receive fee reductions or waivers.
6. (1) The department shall submit a report to the general assembly by January
first each year and annually thereafter. The report shall include, but not be limited to,
the following:
(a) The number of businesses receiving fee reductions;
(b) The cost of waivers to this state;
(c) The growth or stability of participating businesses; and
(d) The business survival rates beyond the start-up period.
(2) The department shall publish an annual report on the department's website
in a format that is accessible to the public. The department shall provide written
reports to members of the public, upon request, at no cost.

HB 3084 3
7. (1) The department shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for
the administration of this section including, but not limited to, the:
(a) Criteria for eligibility;
(b) Documentation requirements;
(c) Fee schedules; and
(d) Parameters for partnerships with business development entities.
(2) Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
8. This section shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
✔